Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Witness and Victim Rights

15.245.
Witness and victim rights pamphlet — Preparation — Distribution.

The Attorney General shall prepare a pamphlet of not more than two (2) pages explaining to victims and witnesses of crime:

How the criminal justice system functions from the point of the complaint through the trial;

The role of the attorney for the Commonwealth;

The role of the defense attorney and whether the victim or witness must talk to the defense attorney and under what conditions;

The process for applying for crime victim compensation money;

The duties of the attorney for the Commonwealth under KRS

421.500

;

How the victim or witness can be notified of the release of a person from a juvenile detention facility, jail, or prison;

General information on how the victim or witness can protect himself from intimidation; and

Such other information as the Attorney General deems relevant.

The Attorney General shall provide the pamphlet to each Commonwealth’s and county attorney in sufficient quantity to distribute to victims of crime and to witnesses for the Commonwealth.

Each Commonwealth’s and county attorney shall distribute the pamphlet to crime victims and witnesses and may distribute the pamphlet to other interested persons. No charge shall be made for the pamphlet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 212, § 10, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 375, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

15.247.
Victim, witness, and family protection program — Protective services.

The Attorney General shall develop and administer a program for the protection of crime victims and witnesses and their immediate families.

Within the limits of the administrative regulations, guidelines, and appropriations for this purpose, the program shall provide funding to the Department of Kentucky State Police or to a sheriff’s office or city or county police department agreeing to provide protection to crime victims and witnesses and their families.

Any Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney may apply to the Attorney General for funding for protection of crime victims, witnesses, and their families.

No protective service shall be rendered to the same person for more than six (6) months.

Protective services funded by this program shall be limited to:

Physical protection of the person;

Physical security measures for the person’s residence, vehicle, workplace, or combination thereof; or

Short-term relocation.

The Attorney General shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A for the operation of the program.

Nothing in this statute shall be construed to create a cause of action for money damages against the state, a county, a municipality, or any of their agencies, public officials, or employees.

No court shall order a law enforcement agency to protect crime victim witnesses or their immediate families.

No record that may lead to the identity of a person seeking or given protection under this section shall be an open record. This protection shall extend even to the question of whether such a record exists.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 50, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 15, effective June 26, 2007.